Utah statutes.
32A-12-216.   Unlawful permitting of intoxication.
(1)  A person may not permit any other person to become intoxicated or any
intoxicated person to consume any alcoholic beverage in:
(a)  any premises of which the person is the owner, tenant, or occupant; or
(b)  in any chartered bus or limousine of which the person is the owner or
operator.
(2)  A violation of Subsection (1) is a class C misdemeanor.
